Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 33. Fire and Emergency Preparedness Drills and Safety Patrols

§ 1481.
Fire and emergency preparedness drills.

The principal or person in charge of a public or independent school or another educational institution, other than a university or college, shall drill the students so they are able to leave the school building or perform other procedures described in the school’s emergency preparedness plan, or both, in the shortest possible time and without panic or confusion.

A drill shall be held at least once in each month during the school year and a record of the date and time of the drill, together with the time consumed in completing the procedure, shall be kept in the official school register, and such register shall be open at all times for inspection by representatives from the Fire Safety Division of the Department of Public Safety or the Agency of Education.

A school district, independent school, or educational institution whose administrative personnel neglect to comply with the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than $500.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

2003, No. 16

, § 2;

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 1, 2005;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 136, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1482.
Safety patrols.

In the exercise of authorized control and supervision over students attending schools and other educational institutions in this State, both public and independent, the school board or other directing authority of a school or institution may organize and supervise school safety patrols and the appointment, with the permission of parents, of students as members for the purpose of influencing and encouraging other students to refrain from crossing public highways at points other than at regular crossings and for the purpose of directing students not to cross highways at times when the presence of traffic would make crossing unsafe.

The school board or other directing authority shall obtain and keep in force adequate accident insurance to protect students acting as safety patrols during the performance of their services.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall, upon the request of a school board or other directing authority of any public or independent educational institution, assign an officer or officers of the State Police to assist the school authorities to organize and supervise school safety patrols, advise and make recommendations concerning the elimination of traffic hazards endangering the safety of students, and otherwise assist in promoting safety education in the schools of the State. Within the appropriation of the Department of Public Safety, the Commissioner shall furnish any equipment, material, and supplies that he or she deems necessary for the proper functioning of the school safety patrols. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize or permit any safety patrol member to direct vehicular traffic.

Liability shall not attach either to a school, educational institution, governing board, individual director, trustee, superintendent, teacher, or other school authority, parent, sponsor, sponsoring organization, or representative of a sponsor, or to the Department of Public Safety or to any of its employees, by virtue of the organization, maintenance, or operation of a school safety patrol and school safety patrol field day activity organized, maintained, and operated under the authority of this section because of injuries sustained by any student or person, whether a member of the patrol or otherwise, by reason of the operation and maintenance.

HISTORY:

Amended

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 137, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1483.
Chapter printed in manuals or handbooks.

This chapter shall be printed in manuals or handbooks prepared for the guidance of teachers in a school or institution subject to the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 33

, § 4;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 138, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.